Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1942.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1101 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any vendor of goods or services shall clearly identify the
actual price to be paid by the buyer for the goods or services which
shall include any fees, charges, or other costs to be paid by the
buyer.
B. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall also
apply to the total amount of state and local sales tax, if
applicable.


Req. No. 11091 Page 1

C. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall not
apply to shipping charges, but if there are shipping charges, such
charges shall be clearly stated as a separate item.
D. The vendor shall provide the information to the buyer within
a reasonable period of time prior to payment for the goods or
services.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11091 MAH 01/13/25















Req. No. 11091 Page 2